Vermont, session 2025-2026, H265.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. SHORT TITLE
This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Fair Access to Online
Utility Payment Act.”
Sec. 2. FINDINGS AND INTENT
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Online payment methods provide a convenient, accessible, and
efficient way for ratepayers to pay municipal utility bills.
VT LEG #380307 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.265
2025 Page 2 of 4
(2) Processing and convenience fees charged for online payments create
barriers for ratepayers, particularly for low-income individuals, and discourage
the use of electronic payment methods.
(3) Municipalities are able to integrate the costs of online payment
systems into their general operating expenses without unfairly burdening
ratepayers.
(b) It is the intent of the General Assembly to promote equitable access to
online payment systems, ensure transparency and accountability in municipal
finances, and encourage adoption of cost-efficient online payment solutions.
Sec. 3. 24 V.S.A. § 1585 is added to read:
§ 1585. PROHIBITION OF CONVENIENCE FEES FOR ONLINE
PAYMENTS
(a) A municipality shall not impose a processing fee, convenience fee,
surcharge, or other additional cost on a ratepayer for paying a municipal utility
bill or other fee through an electronic payment method, including an online
portal, mobile application, or credit card transaction.
(b) The prohibition in subsection (a) of this section shall apply regardless
of whether the municipality contracts with a third-party service provider to
facilitate online payments.
VT LEG #380307 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.265
2025 Page 3 of 4
(c) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a municipality
shall absorb any costs associated with providing online utility payment options
into the municipality’s general operating expenses.
(d) A municipality shall include in its annual budget a disclosure of the
costs associated with online payment systems and identify any rate increases
directly attributable to covering these costs. A rate increase resulting from the
cost of providing an online payment system shall be directly proportional to
the actual costs incurred for such system.
(e) As used in this section, a “utility” means an electric, water, wastewater,
or communications retail service provider.
Sec. 4. 32 V.S.A. § 583 is amended to read:
§ 583. CREDIT CARD PAYMENTS
* * *
(e) A municipality that accepts electronic payments for providing electric,
water, wastewater, or communications service shall not impose a processing
fee, convenience fee, surcharge, or other additional cost on the payer for the
use of such electronic payment method. A municipality shall provide
justification for a proposed rate increase resulting from the cost of an
electronic payment system in its annual financial report.
VT LEG #380307 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.265
2025 Page 4 of 4
Sec. 5. ENCOURAGEMENT OF EFFICIENCY IN ONLINE PAYMENT
SYSTEMS
(a) The State Treasurer shall provide guidance and support to
municipalities for negotiating cost-effective terms with third-party payment
processors and explore fee-free payment methods such as Automated Clearing
House (AHC) transfers.
(b) The Secretary of State or designee, in consultation with the State
Treasurer and the Vermont League of Cities and Towns, shall design a grant
program to assist municipalities with the transition to modern, cost-efficient
online payment systems. On or before December 15, 2025, the Secretary’s
findings and recommendations for such grant program shall be submitted in
writing to the Senate Committees on Finance and on Government Operations
and to the House Committees on Energy and Digital Infrastructure and on
Government Operations and Military Affairs.
Sec. 6. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380307 v.2